Utah statutes.
54-8a-5.5.   Determining the precise location of marked underground
facilities.
(1) (a)  An excavator may not use any power-operated or power-driven
excavating or boring equipment within 24 inches of the markings made in
accordance with Section 54-8a-5 unless the excavator determines the exact
location of the underground facility by excavating with hand tools to confirm
that the excavation will not damage the underground facilities.
(b)  An operator may waive, in writing or electronically, the requirement that
the excavator determine the exact location of the underground facilities by
excavating with hand tools.
(2)  Power-operated or power-driven excavating or boring equipment may be used
for the removal of any existing pavement if there is no underground facility
contained in the pavement, as marked by the operator.
(3)  The excavator may use power-operated or power-driven excavating or boring
equipment within 24 inches of the markings only:
(a)  to a depth agreed upon by the operator; and
(b)  if allowed by the operator.
